Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1404
Powers; limitation.

All duties given and delegated to the county comptroller, which are performed or exercised by other county officials of such county, are hereby expressly taken from such county officials and made the special duty and obligation of the county comptroller; Provided, that no duty required to be performed or power exercised shall be taken from any county official which shall be necessary for the proper performance of any duty required by law of such official which is not hereby made the special duty of the county comptroller.

Laws 1915, c. 181, § 4, p. 370;

C.S.1922, § 4940;

C.S.1929, § 26-1104;

R.S.1943, § 23-1404.